Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3003
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Teleworker Job Creation Act:

(1) Application
filing date means the date that the employer files an application for an agreement
with the director under the act;

(2) Base year means the three hundred sixty-five
days immediately preceding the application filing date;

(3) Base-year
employee means any individual who was employed in Nebraska and subject to
the Nebraska income tax on compensation received from the employer or its
predecessors during the base year and who is employed at the project;

(4) Director
means the Director of Economic Development;

(5) Employer means a corporation, partnership,
limited liability company, cooperative, limited cooperative association, or
joint venture, together with such other entities that are, or would be if
incorporated, members of the same unitary group as defined in section 77-2734.04,
that employs the teleworkers for which the job training reimbursements are
applied for under the act;

(6) Qualified training program means a training program
which has the following features: (a) The program has at least fifteen hours
of instruction per trainee, all of which will occur in the trainee's residence;
(b) trainees are each paid at least the federal minimum hourly wage per hour
of training performed; (c) trainees are being trained as teleworkers; and
(d) the program requires the trainees to pass job-related tests established
by the employer;

(7) Qualifying employee means a teleworker who has the following
characteristics: (a) The teleworker constitutes an employee of the employer
under section 77-2753; (b) the teleworker resides in Nebraska at the time
of his or her employment application according to his or her statement on
his or her employment application; (c) the teleworker completes a qualified
training program; (d) the teleworker is not a base-year employee; (e) the
teleworker is not required to purchase a computer from the employer; (f) the
teleworker has passed such job-related tests required under the qualified
training program; (g) the teleworker has passed a criminal background check
as required by the employer; and (h) the teleworker has been allowed to complete
the hiring process paperwork from his or her residence, except for any drug
testing and notarized proof of identity, which can be performed at such location
directed by the employer; and

(8) Teleworker means a person who works
for the employer from his or her residence through the use of telecommunication
systems, such as the telephone and the Internet, for inbound-only service
and order-taking sales calls, which calls may also include the upselling of
related products or services.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 3.